dev/adjective/adjective.ne.dix
  <!-- धेरै; धेरै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="धेरै__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नेप्टी; नेप्टी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नेप्टी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उपयुक्त; उपयुक्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उपयुक्त__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जिउँदो; जिउँदो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जिउँदो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भोको-नांगो; भोक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भोक/ो-नांगो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा-नांगा</l>
          <r>ो-नांगो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तयार; तयार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तयार__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पातलो; पातलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पातलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वास्तविक; वास्तविक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वास्तविक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मुकुण्डो; मुकुण्डो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मुकुण्डो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एकसरो; एकसरो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एकसरो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- माओवाद; माओवाद; 1 -->
    <pardef n="माओवाद__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चनाखो; चनाख; 3 -->
    <pardef n="चनाख/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अलि; अलि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अलि__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तरुनो; तरुन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तरुन/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अनौठो; अनौठ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="अनौठ/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- न्यानो; न्यान; 2 -->
    <pardef n="न्यान/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुन्दर; सुन्दर; 2 -->
    <pardef n="सुन्दर__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुल्टो; सुल्ट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सुल्ट/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दाँतवाला; दाँतवाल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दाँतवाल/ा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कच्चो; कच्च; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कच्च/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पूर्व; पूर्व; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पूर्व__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्नेही; स्नेही; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्नेही__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बढ्दो; बढ्दो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बढ्दो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पूर्ण; पूर्ण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पूर्ण__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गुरूङ; गुरूङ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गुरूङ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सेनी</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आन्तरिक; आन्तरिक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आन्तरिक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रभाव; प्रभाव; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रभाव__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>कारी</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कलिलो; कलिल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कलिल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लोभलाग्दो; लोभलाग्दो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लोभलाग्दो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ठुलो; ठुलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ठुलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चिसो; चिस; 2 -->
    <pardef n="चिस/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्यारी-प्यारी; प्यारी-प्यारी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्यारी-प्यारी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वातज्वरो; वातज्वरो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वातज्वरो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बाक्लो; बाक्ल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="बाक्ल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="धेरै"><i>धेरै</i><par n="धेरै__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नेप्टी"><i>नेप्टी</i><par n="नेप्टी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उपयुक्त"><i>उपयुक्त</i><par n="उपयुक्त__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जिउँदो"><i>जिउँदो</i><par n="जिउँदो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="भोको-नांगो"><i>भोक</i><par n="भोक/ो-नांगो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तयार"><i>तयार</i><par n="तयार__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पातलो"><i>पातलो</i><par n="पातलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="वास्तविक"><i>वास्तविक</i><par n="वास्तविक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मुकुण्डो"><i>मुकुण्डो</i><par n="मुकुण्डो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="एकसरो"><i>एकसरो</i><par n="एकसरो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="माओवाद"><i>माओवाद</i><par n="माओवाद__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चनाखो"><i>चनाख</i><par n="चनाख/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अलि"><i>अलि</i><par n="अलि__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तरुनो"><i>तरुन</i><par n="तरुन/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनौठो"><i>अनौठ</i><par n="अनौठ/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="न्यानो"><i>न्यान</i><par n="न्यान/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सुन्दर"><i>सुन्दर</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सुल्टो"><i>सुल्ट</i><par n="सुल्ट/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दाँतवाला"><i>दाँतवाल</i><par n="दाँतवाल/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कच्चो"><i>कच्च</i><par n="कच्च/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पूर्व"><i>पूर्व</i><par n="पूर्व__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="स्नेही"><i>स्नेही</i><par n="स्नेही__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बढ्दो"><i>बढ्दो</i><par n="बढ्दो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पूर्ण"><i>पूर्ण</i><par n="पूर्ण__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गुरूङ"><i>गुरूङ</i><par n="गुरूङ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="आन्तरिक"><i>आन्तरिक</i><par n="आन्तरिक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रभाव"><i>प्रभाव</i><par n="प्रभाव__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कलिलो"><i>कलिल</i><par n="कलिल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लोभलाग्दो"><i>लोभलाग्दो</i><par n="लोभलाग्दो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ठुलो"><i>ठुलो</i><par n="ठुलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चिसो"><i>चिस</i><par n="चिस/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्यारी-प्यारी"><i>प्यारी-प्यारी</i><par n="प्यारी-प्यारी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="वातज्वरो"><i>वातज्वरो</i><par n="वातज्वरो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बाक्लो"><i>बाक्ल</i><par n="बाक्ल/ो__adj"/></e>
